Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.160

Use of persons, money, or property for private gain.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

(1) No state officer or state employee may employ or use any person, money, or property under the officer's or employee's official control or direction, or in his or her official custody, for the private benefit or gain of the officer, employee, or another.

(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to benefit others as part of a state officer's or state employee's official duties. It is not a violation of this section for a legislator or an appropriate legislative staff designee to engage in activities listed under RCW 42.52.070(2) or 42.52.822.

(3) This section does not prohibit de minimis use of state facilities to provide employees with information about (a) medical, surgical, and hospital care; (b) life insurance or accident and health disability insurance; or (c) individual retirement accounts, by any person, firm, or corporation administering such program as part of authorized payroll deductions pursuant to RCW 41.04.020.

(4) The appropriate ethics boards may adopt rules providing exceptions to this section for occasional use of the state officer or state employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not result in interference with the proper performance of public duties.

(5) This section does not apply to activities conducted by legislative employees authorized under RCW 44.90.110.

[ 2024 c 333 s 21; 2023 c 91 s 3; 2022 c 37 s 2; 2014 c 28 s 1; 1996 c 213 s 7; 1994 c 154 s 116; 1987 c 426 s 3. Formerly RCW 42.18.217.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.